nb: Ukulele-stemmertype: Friksjonsskruer; Mekaniske stemmeskruer; Åpne stemmeskruer; Planetariske stemmeskruer; Lukkede stemmeskruer; Annet
sv: Typ av ukulele-stämapparat: Friktionsskruvar; Kuggväxlade stämskruvar; Öppna stämskruvar; Planetväxlade stämskruvar; Kapslade/stängda stämskruvar; Övrigt
ja: ウクレレチューナータイプ: フリクションペグ; ギアペグ; オープンギアペグ; プラネタリーペグ; 密閉型/クローズドギアペグ; その他
es: Tipo de afinador del ukelele: Clavijas de fricción; Clavijas de engranaje; Clavijas de engranaje abierto; Clavijas planetarias; Clavijas de engranaje sellado/cerrado; Otro
en: Ukulele tuner type: Friction pegs; Geared tuners; Open-gear tuners; Planetary tuners; Sealed/closed-gear tuners; Other
zh-TW: 烏克麗麗調音器類型: 摩擦式弦鈕; 齒輪式弦鈕; 開放式齒輪弦鈕; 行星齒輪弦鈕; 封閉式齒輪弦鈕; 其他
vi: Loại máy chỉnh âm Ukulele: Chốt ma sát; Bộ chỉnh âm bánh răng; Bộ chỉnh âm bánh răng hở; Bộ chỉnh âm bánh răng hành tinh; Bộ chỉnh âm bánh răng kín; Khác
ko: 우쿨렐레 튜너 유형: 마찰식 펙; 기어식 튜너; 오픈 기어 튜너; 플래니터리 튜너; 밀폐/폐쇄형 기어 튜너; 기타
bg-BG: Тип ключове за настройване на укулелето: Фрикционни ключове; Зъбчати ключове; Отворени ключове; Планетарни ключове; Затворени/капсуловани ключове; Други
de: Art der Ukulelenstimmwirbel: Friktionswirbel; Übersetzte Mechaniken; Offene Mechaniken; Planetenmechaniken; Geschlossene Mechaniken; Andere
fr: Type de mécanique de l’ukulélé: Chevilles à friction; Mécaniques à engrenages; Mécaniques à engrenages ouverts; Mécaniques planétaires; Mécaniques fermées/scellées; Autre
pt-PT: Tipo de afinação do ukulele: Cravelhas de fricção; Cravelhas de engrenagem; Cravelhas de engrenagem aberta; Cravelhas planetárias; Cravelhas de engrenagem selada/fechada; Outro
tr: Ukulele burguluk tipi: Sürtünmeli burgular; Dişlili burgular; Açık dişlili burgular; Planet burgular; Mühürlü/kapalı dişlili burgular; Diğer
nl: Ukulele stemmertype: Frictiepennen; Tandwielstemsleutels; Open stemsleutels; Planetaire stemsleutels; Gesloten stemsleutels; Anders
hr-HR: Vrsta podešivača za ukulele: Frikcijske mašinice; Mašinice sa zupčanikom; Mašinice s otvorenim zupčanikom; Planetarne mašinice; Zatvorene mašinice sa zupčanikom; Ostalo
th: ประเภทจูนเนอร์อูคูเลเล่: ลูกบิดแบบฝืด; ลูกบิดแบบเฟือง; ลูกบิดแบบเฟืองเปลือย; ลูกบิดแบบแพลนเนทารี; ลูกบิดแบบเฟืองปิด; อื่นๆ
da: Stemmeskruetype for ukulele: Friktionsskruer; Stemmeskruer med gear; Åbne stemmeskruer; Stemmeskruer med planetgear; Lukkede stemmeskruer; Andet
el: Τύπος κουρδιστηριού ουκουλέλε: Κλειδιά τριβής; Κλειδιά με γρανάζια; Κλειδιά με ανοιχτά γρανάζια; Πλανητικά κλειδιά; Σφραγισμένα/κλειστά κλειδιά με γρανάζια; Άλλο
sl-SI: Vrsta navijalcev ukuleleja: Torni zatiči; Zobniški navijalci; Navijalci z odprtim zobnikom; Planetarni navijalci; Navijalci z zaprtim zobnikom; Drugo
ru: Тип колков укулеле: Фрикционные колки; Колки с зубчатой передачей; Открытые колки; Планетарные колки; Закрытые колки; Другое
sk-SK: Typ ladičky pre ukulele: Trecie kolíky; Prevodové ladiace mechaniky; Otvorené ladiace mechaniky; Planetárne ladiace mechaniky; Uzavreté ladiace mechaniky; Iné
it: Tipo di accordatore dell'ukulele: Piroli a frizione; Meccaniche a ingranaggi; Meccaniche aperte; Meccaniche planetarie; Meccaniche sigillate/chiuse; Altro
zh-CN: 尤克里里调音器类型: 摩擦式弦轴; 齿轮式弦轴; 开放式齿轮弦轴; 行星齿轮式弦轴; 封闭式齿轮弦轴; 其他
cs: Typ ladicího mechanismu ukulele: Třecí kolíky; Převodové ladicí mechaniky; Otevřené převodové mechaniky; Planetární ladicí mechaniky; Uzavřené převodové mechaniky; Ostatní
hu: Ukulele hangolókulcs-típusa: Súrlódó kulcsok; Áttételes kulcsok; Nyitott áttételes kulcsok; Bolygóműves kulcsok; Zárt/burkolt áttételes kulcsok; Egyéb
pt-BR: Ukulele tipo de tarraxa: Tarraxas de fricção; Tarraxas com engrenagens; Tarraxas com engrenagens abertas; Tarraxas planetárias; Tarraxas blindadas/fechadas; Outro
lt-LT: Ukulelės derintuvo tipas: Frikciniai kuoliukai; Derikliai su krumpliaračiais; Atviri derikliai su krumpliaračiais; Planetariniai derikliai; Uždari derikliai su krumpliaračiais; Kita
fi: Ukulelen virittimen tyyppi: Kitkatapit; Koneistovirittimet; Avoimet viritinkoneistot; Planeettavirittimet; Suljetut viritinkoneistot; Muu
ro-RO: Tipul cheilor de acordare ale ukulelei: Cheițe cu frecare; Cheițe cu angrenaj; Cheițe cu angrenaj deschis; Cheițe planetare; Cheițe cu angrenaj închis/sigilat; Altele
pl: Typ stroików ukulele: Kołki cierne; Klucze zębate; Klucze otwarte; Klucze planetarne; Klucze zamknięte; Inne